Utah statutes.
31A-9-207.   Termination of organization permit and payment of organization expenses.

Section 31A-5-209, other than Subsection (3)(c), applies to fraternals, except that:

(1)  the word "mutual" shall be read "fraternal"; and

(2)  the reference to "Section 31A-5-212" shall be read "Section 31A-9-210."

